Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 16
ENVIRONMENTAL POLICY AND REGULATIONS

Article 1

Environmental Policy.

Article 2

Procedure for Amending Regulations.

Law reviews.

-
For annual eleventh circuit survey of environmental law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 1411 (1991). For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).